Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202546-1607
Approval to operate, defined.

Approval to operate means authorization in writing issued by the Chief Water Officer to an owner who has completed construction, reconstruction, enlargement, or alteration of a dam.

Laws 2005, LB 335, § 7;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 273.